Wisconsin, session 2025, SB788.
do enact as follows:SB788,11Section 1. 15.165 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB788,2,2215.165 (title) Same; attached boards and offices.SB788,23Section 2. 15.165 (5) of the statutes is created to read:SB788,2,9415.165 (5) Office of internal audit. There is created an office of internal 5audit that is attached to the department of employee trust funds under s. 15.03. 6The office shall be under the direction and supervision of an internal auditor who 7shall be appointed by the employee trust funds board and serve outside the 8classified service. The internal auditor shall report directly to the employee trust 9funds board.SB788,310Section 3. 16.50 (3) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB788,2,171116.50 (3) (b) No change in the number of full-time equivalent positions 12authorized through the biennial budget process or other legislative act may be made 13without the approval of the joint committee on finance, except for position changes 14made by the governor under s. 16.505 (1) (c), (2), or (2j), by the investment board 15under s. 16.505 (2g), by the employee trust funds board under s. 16.505 (2d), or by 16the board of regents of the University of Wisconsin System under s. 16.505 (2m) or 17(2p).SB788,418Section 4. 16.505 (1) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB788,2,211916.505 (1) (intro.) Except as provided in subs. (2), (2d), (2g), (2j), (2m), and 20(2p), no position, as defined in s. 230.03 (11), regardless of funding source or type, 21may be created or abolished unless authorized by one of the following:SB788,522Section 5. 16.505 (2d) of the statutes is created to read:SB788,3,3116.505 (2d) The employee trust funds board may create or abolish a full-time 2equivalent internal auditor position or portion thereof funded from revenues 3appropriated under s. 20.515 (1) (w).SB788,64Section 6. 20.923 (7) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB788,3,23520.923 (7) General senior executive positions. (intro.) The salary ranges 6for the director and the executive assistant of the Wisconsin Technical College 7System and for the secretary, deputy secretary, and assistant deputy secretary, and 8internal auditor of the department of employee trust funds shall be contained in the 9recommendations of the administrator of the division of personnel management in 10the department of administration under s. 230.12 (3) (e). The board of the 11Wisconsin Technical College System shall set the salaries for the director and 12executive assistant of the Wisconsin Technical College System within the range to 13which the positions are assigned to recognize merit, to permit orderly salary 14progression, and to recognize competitive factors. The employee trust funds board 15shall set the salary salaries for the secretary and the internal auditor of the 16department of employee trust funds within the range to which the each position is 17assigned to recognize merit, to permit orderly salary progression, and to recognize 18competitive factors. The salary of the deputy secretary of the department of 19employee trust funds and the salary of the assistant deputy secretary of the 20department of employee trust funds shall be set in accordance with subs. (8) and (9), 21respectively. The salary of any incumbent in the positions identified in pars. (a) and 22(b) may not exceed the maximum of the salary range for the group to which the 23position is assigned. The positions are assigned as follows:SB788,724Section 7. 20.923 (7) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB788,4,4120.923 (7) (a) The positions assigned to general senior executive group 1 are 2the executive assistant of the Wisconsin Technical College System and, the 3assistant deputy secretary of the department of employee trust funds, and the 4internal auditor of the department of employee trust funds.SB788,85Section 8. 40.03 (1) (dm) of the statutes is created to read:SB788,4,8640.03 (1) (dm) Shall develop and implement policies, principles, and directives 7for the office of internal audit and fix the compensation of the internal auditor 8provided for under s. 15.165 (5).SB788,99Section 9. 40.03 (4m) of the statutes is created to read:SB788,4,131040.03 (4m) Office of internal audit. (a) The office of internal audit shall 11provide independent assurance that the public employee trust fund assets under 12the control of the department are safeguarded for the purpose of ensuring the 13fulfillment of the benefit commitments to individuals under this chapter.SB788,4,1514(b) The internal auditor may review any activity, information, or record of the 15department that relates to the administration of the fund.SB788,4,1916(c) The internal auditor shall plan and conduct audit activities, including 17external audits, risk assessments, research projects, and management reviews, 18under the direction of the board and in accordance with policies, principles, and 19directives determined by the board.SB788,4,2220(d) The internal auditor shall monitor the department’s compliance with 21applicable legal requirements and contracts entered into by the department and 22the board.SB788,5,1123(e) Notwithstanding s. 230.08 (2) (pb), if an employee of the department 1holding the position of internal auditor in the classified service has achieved 2permanent status in class before the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB 3inserts date], and is appointed by the employee trust funds board under s. 15.165 4(5) while serving in that position in the unclassified service, that employee shall 5retain reinstatement privileges as set forth in s. 230.33 (1m). An employee of the 6department holding the position of internal auditor in the classified service on the 7effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], who has not achieved 8permanent status in class in any position at the department on that date, shall have 9reinstatement privileges as set forth in s. 230.33 (1m) if the employee successfully 10completes service equivalent to the probationary period required in the classified 11service for the position that such an employee holds on that date.SB788,1012Section 10. 230.08 (2) (pb) of the statutes is created to read:SB788,5,1313230.08 (2) (pb) The internal auditor appointed under s. 15.165 (5).SB788,1314Section 13. Nonstatutory provisions.SB788,5,1815(1) Incumbent internal auditor. The individual holding the position of 16internal auditor in the department of employee trust funds on the day before the 17effective date of this subsection shall continue to serve in that position until an 18internal auditor is appointed under s. 15.165 (5).SB788,5,1919